Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 2

Volunteer Services

11-24-201. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of environment and conservation; and

“Municipality” means any city, town, metropolitan government, or other political subdivision, including counties, of the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1993, ch. 256, § 1.

11-24-202. Programs established by formal agreements.

The governing body of any municipality or the recreation board or commission, as appropriate, may enter into formal agreements with business and civic groups and individuals for volunteer services to maintain and make improvements to real and personal property in municipal parks in accordance with plans devised by the municipality or its recreation board after consultation with the volunteers.

Acts 1993, ch. 256, § 2.